Washington statutes.
RCW 43.155.065

Emergency public works projects.

The board may make low-interest or interest-free loans or grants to local governments for emergency public works projects. Emergency public works projects shall include the construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of a public water system that is in violation of health and safety standards and is being operated by a local government on a temporary basis. The loans or grants may be used to help fund all or part of an emergency public works project less any reimbursement from any of the following sources: (1) Federal disaster or emergency funds, including funds from the federal emergency management agency; (2) state disaster or emergency funds; (3) insurance settlements; or (4) litigation.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 7; 2001 c 131 s 3; 1990 c 133 s 7; 1988 c 93 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Severability—1990 c 133: See notes following RCW 36.94.140.